District of Columbia statutes.
11-1323

Certification of cases by Superior Court judges; recertification; certification by Branch.

(a)

When the interests of justice seem to require and all parties consent thereto, a judge of the Superior Court may certify a case to the Small Claims and Conciliation Branch for conciliation or to obtain a complete or partial agreed statement of facts or stipulation, which will simplify and expedite the ultimate trial of the case. With the consent of all parties, the trial of the case may be completed in the Branch. In the absence of consent, the case shall be recertified to another judge of the Civil Division for trial.

(b)

When the interests of justice seem to require, the Branch may certify to the Civil Division any action brought in the Branch under section 11-1321.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 490, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
District of Columbia Court of Appeals, judges, service and compensation, see § 11-703.
Superior Court of the District of Columbia, judges, service and compensation, see § 11-904.
1981 Ed., § 11-1323.
1973 Ed., § 11-1323.